dev/uk.dix
<?xml version="1.0" encoding="UTF-8"?>
<!--
	Dictionary:
	Sections: 1
	Entries: 6
	Sdefs: 12
	Paradigms: 6
	Last processed by: apertium-dixtools speling uk.csv uk.dix

-->
<dictionary>
  <alphabet>шШвВиИдДкКіІсСтТьЬоОюЮеЕйЙяЯмМхХнНлЛбБпПчЧаАуУ</alphabet>
  <sdefs>
    <sdef n="n" /> 
    <sdef n="f" /> 
    <sdef n="sg" /> 
    <sdef n="nom" /> 
    <sdef n="gen" /> 
    <sdef n="dat" /> 
    <sdef n="acc" /> 
    <sdef n="ins" /> 
    <sdef n="loc" /> 
    <sdef n="voc" /> 
    <sdef n="pl" /> 
    <sdef n="ani" /> 
  </sdefs>
  <pardefs>
<pardef n="швидк/ість__n">
  <e>       <p><l>ість</l> <r>ість<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ості</l> <r>ість<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ості</l> <r>ість<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ість</l> <r>ість<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>істю</l> <r>ість<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ins"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ості</l> <r>ість<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>осте</l> <r>ість<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="voc"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ості</l> <r>ість<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>остей</l><r>ість<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>остям</l><r>ість<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ості</l> <r>ість<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>остями</l><r>ість<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ins"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>остях</l><r>ість<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="loc"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ості</l> <r>ість<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="voc"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="тін/ь__n">
  <e>       <p><l>ь</l>         <r>ь<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>і</l>         <r>ь<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>і</l>         <r>ь<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ь</l>         <r>ь<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ню</l>        <r>ь<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ins"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>і</l>         <r>ь<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>е</l>         <r>ь<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="voc"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>і</l>         <r>ь<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ей</l>        <r>ь<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ям</l>        <r>ь<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>і</l>         <r>ь<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ями</l>       <r>ь<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ins"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ях</l>        <r>ь<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="loc"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>і</l>         <r>ь<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="voc"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="с/іль__n">
  <e>       <p><l>іль</l>      <r>іль<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>олі</l>      <r>іль<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>олі</l>      <r>іль<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>іль</l>      <r>іль<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>іллю</l>     <r>іль<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ins"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>олі</l>      <r>іль<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>оле</l>      <r>іль<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="voc"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>олі</l>      <r>іль<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>олей</l>     <r>іль<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>олям</l>     <r>іль<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>олі</l>      <r>іль<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>олями</l>    <r>іль<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ins"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>олях</l>     <r>іль<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="loc"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>олі</l>      <r>іль<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="voc"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="любов__n">
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>і</l>         <r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>і</l>         <r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>'ю</l>        <r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ins"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>і</l>         <r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>е</l>         <r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="voc"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="п/іч__n">
  <e>       <p><l>іч</l>       <r>іч<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ечі</l>      <r>іч<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ечі</l>      <r>іч<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>іч</l>       <r>іч<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>іччю</l>     <r>іч<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ins"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ечі</l>      <r>іч<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ече</l>      <r>іч<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="voc"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ечі</l>      <r>іч<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ечей</l>     <r>іч<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ечам</l>     <r>іч<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ечі</l>      <r>іч<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ечами</l>    <r>іч<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ins"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ечах</l>     <r>іч<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="loc"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ечі</l>      <r>іч<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="voc"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="мам/а__n">
  <e>       <p><l>а</l>         <r>а<s n="n"/><s n="ani"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>и</l>         <r>а<s n="n"/><s n="ani"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>і</l>         <r>а<s n="n"/><s n="ani"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>у</l>         <r>а<s n="n"/><s n="ani"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ою</l>        <r>а<s n="n"/><s n="ani"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ins"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>і</l>         <r>а<s n="n"/><s n="ani"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>о</l>         <r>а<s n="n"/><s n="ani"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="voc"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>и</l>         <r>а<s n="n"/><s n="ani"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r>а<s n="n"/><s n="ani"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>ів</l>        <r>а<s n="n"/><s n="ani"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ам</l>        <r>а<s n="n"/><s n="ani"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r>а<s n="n"/><s n="ani"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>ів</l>        <r>а<s n="n"/><s n="ani"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ами</l>       <r>а<s n="n"/><s n="ani"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ins"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ах</l>        <r>а<s n="n"/><s n="ani"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="loc"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>и</l>         <r>а<s n="n"/><s n="ani"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="voc"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>
  </pardefs>

  <section id="main" type="standard">
<e lm="швидкість"><i>швид</i><par n="швидк/ість__n"/></e>
<e lm="тінь">            <i>тін</i><par n="тін/ь__n"/></e>
<e lm="сіль">          <i>с</i><par n="с/іль__n"/></e>
<e lm="любов">           <i>любов</i><par n="любов__n"/></e>
<e lm="піч">           <i>п</i><par n="п/іч__n"/></e>
<e lm="мама">            <i>мам</i><par n="мам/а__n"/></e>
  </section>
</dictionary>
